Illinois, session 104th, SB2876.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-22.6 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-22.6)  (from Ch. 122, par. 10-22.6)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)8    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 9searches. 10    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 11misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct 12perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 13of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 14expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 15have been requested to appear at a meeting of the board, or 16with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss their 17child's behavior. Such request shall be made by registered or 18certified mail and shall state the time, place and purpose of 19the meeting. The board, or a hearing officer appointed by it, 20at such meeting shall state the reasons for dismissal and the 21date on which the expulsion is to become effective. If a 22hearing officer is appointed by the board, the hearing officer 23shall report to the board a written summary of the evidence   SB2876- 2 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1heard at the meeting and the board may take such action thereon 2as it finds appropriate. If the board acts to expel a student, 3the written expulsion decision shall detail the specific 4reasons why removing the student from the learning environment 5is in the best interest of the school. The expulsion decision 6shall also include a rationale as to the specific duration of 7the expulsion. An expelled student may be immediately 8transferred to an alternative program in the manner provided 9in Article 13A or 13B of this Code. A student must not be 10denied transfer because of the expulsion, except in cases in 11which such transfer is deemed to cause a threat to the safety 12of students or staff in the alternative program. 13    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 14superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 15principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend 16students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to 17suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 18the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 19subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action 20shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 21policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the 22principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 23school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 24to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to 25gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board 26may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety   SB2876- 3 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1reasons. 2    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 3parents or guardian of a student along with a full statement of 4the reasons for such suspension and a notice of their right to 5a review. The school board must be given a summary of the 6notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 7suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardian, 8the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 9review such action of the superintendent or principal, 10assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 11parents or guardian of the student may appear and discuss the 12suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing 13officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 14a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 15its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 16hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 17appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 18subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 19decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 20misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 21suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 22specific duration of the suspension.23    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 24and consequences available to school officials, school 25exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 26are the most serious. School officials shall limit the number   SB2876- 4 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1and duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest 2extent practicable, and it is recommended that they use them 3only for legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that 4students are not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is 5recommended that school officials consider forms of 6non-exclusionary discipline prior to using out-of-school 7suspensions or expulsions. 8    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 9Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies 10by which school administrators are required to suspend or 11expel students for particular behaviors.12    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 13used only if the student's continuing presence in school would 14pose a threat to school safety or a disruption to other 15students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 16subsection (b-15), "threat to school safety or a disruption to 17other students' learning opportunities" shall be determined on 18a case-by-case basis by the school board or its designee. 19School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 20such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 21length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.22    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 23out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions, 24and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 25only if other appropriate and available behavioral and 26disciplinary interventions have been exhausted and the   SB2876- 5 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1student's continuing presence in school would either (i) pose 2a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or members of 3the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, impede, or 4interfere with the operation of the school. For purposes of 5this subsection (b-20), "threat to the safety of other 6students, staff, or members of the school community" and 7"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the 8operation of the school" shall be determined on a case-by-case 9basis by school officials. For purposes of this subsection 10(b-20), the determination of whether "appropriate and 11available behavioral and disciplinary interventions have been 12exhausted" shall be made by school officials. School officials 13shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, 14address such disruptions, and minimize the length of student 15exclusions to the greatest extent practicable. Within the 16suspension decision described in subsection (b) of this 17Section or the expulsion decision described in subsection (a) 18of this Section, it shall be documented whether other 19interventions were attempted or whether it was determined that 20there were no other appropriate and available interventions.21    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 22than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 23support services during the period of their suspension. For 24purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 25support services" shall be determined by school authorities. 26Within the suspension decision described in subsection (b) of   SB2876- 6 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1this Section, it shall be documented whether such services are 2to be provided or whether it was determined that there are no 3such appropriate and available services. 4    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 5appropriate and available support services.6    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 7re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 8expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 9consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State 10Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 11and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 12suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 13alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 14Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025. 15    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 16suspended students, including those students suspended from 17the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 18school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 19equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 20a student's parent or guardian to notify school officials that 21a student suspended from the school bus does not have 22alternate transportation to school. 23    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 24local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 25meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be 26the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.  SB2876- 7 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 2provide ongoing professional development to all school 3personnel, school board members, and school resource officers, 4on the requirements of this Section and Section 10-20.14, the 5adverse consequences of school exclusion and justice-system 6involvement, effective classroom management strategies, 7culturally responsive discipline, trauma-responsive learning 8environments, as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3-11, 9the appropriate and available supportive services for the 10promotion of student attendance and engagement, and 11developmentally appropriate disciplinary methods that promote 12positive and healthy school climates. 13    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 14time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a 15case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have 16brought one of the following objects to school, any 17school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 18that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 19expelled for a period of not less than one year:20        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 21    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 22    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 23    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 24    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 25    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period 26    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the   SB2876- 8 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 2    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.3        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 4    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other 5    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily 6    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 7    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 8    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 9    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 10    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 11Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 12consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 13Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 14expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a 15transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 16Article 13A of the School Code.17    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 18superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 19principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 20student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 21a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 22calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 23that student has been determined to have made an explicit 24threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a 25student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet 26website through which the threat was made is a site that was   SB2876- 9 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 2was available to third parties who worked or studied within 3the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 4the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to 5the safety and security of the threatened individual because 6of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 7student inside the school. 8    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 9authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as 10lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 11equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 12personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 13without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 14search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 15Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of 16privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 17left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 18the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 19conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 20lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 21controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 22illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 23searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 24If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 25evidence that the student has violated or is violating either 26the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules,   SB2876- 10 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 2disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 3turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.4    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or 5expulsion from school and all school activities and a 6prohibition from being present on school grounds.7    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 8a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 9public or private school in this or any other state, the 10student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 11expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 12of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 13under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 14school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 15or staff in the alternative program.16    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 17students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 18difficulties.19    (i) A student may not be issued a monetary fine or fee as a 20disciplinary consequence, though this shall not preclude 21requiring a student to provide restitution for lost, stolen, 22or damaged property.23    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 24apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 25special charter districts, and school districts organized 26under Article 34 of this Code.   SB2876- 11 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1    (k) The expulsion of students enrolled in programs funded 2under Section 1C-2 of this Code is subject to the requirements 3under paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 2-3.71 of 4this Code.5    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school 6district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 7focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 8positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 9A school district may employ a school social worker or a 10licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 11suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12. 12(Source: P.A. 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 13103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 8-9-24; revised 9-25-24.) 14    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)15    Sec. 10-22.6. Suspension or expulsion of students; school 16searches. 17    (a) To expel students guilty of gross disobedience or 18misconduct, including gross disobedience or misconduct 19perpetuated by electronic means, pursuant to subsection (b-20) 20of this Section, and no action shall lie against them for such 21expulsion. Expulsion shall take place only after the parents 22or guardians have been requested to appear at a meeting of the 23board, or with a hearing officer appointed by it, to discuss 24their child's behavior. Such request shall be made by 25registered or certified mail and shall state the time, place   SB2876- 12 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1and purpose of the meeting and shall include all evidence, 2including, but not limited to, video evidence and written 3materials, held by the school district that has led to the 4school board's decision to expel the student. The board, or a 5hearing officer appointed by it, at such meeting shall state 6the reasons for dismissal and the date on which the expulsion 7is to become effective. If a hearing officer is appointed by 8the board, the hearing officer shall report to the board a 9written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting and the 10board may take such action thereon as it finds appropriate. If 11the board acts to expel a student, the written expulsion 12decision shall detail the specific reasons why removing the 13student from the learning environment is in the best interest 14of the school. The expulsion decision shall also include a 15rationale as to the specific duration of the expulsion. An 16expelled student may be immediately transferred to an 17alternative program in the manner provided in Article 13A or 1813B of this Code. A student must not be denied transfer because 19of the expulsion, except in cases in which such transfer is 20deemed to cause a threat to the safety of students or staff in 21the alternative program. Nothing in this subsection (a) 22requires a school district to not be in compliance with the 23federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974. 24    (b) To suspend or by policy to authorize the 25superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 26principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend   SB2876- 13 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct, or to 2suspend students guilty of gross disobedience or misconduct on 3the school bus from riding the school bus, pursuant to 4subsections (b-15) and (b-20) of this Section, and no action 5shall lie against them for such suspension. The board may by 6policy authorize the superintendent of the district or the 7principal, assistant principal, or dean of students of any 8school to suspend students guilty of such acts for a period not 9to exceed 10 school days. If a student is suspended due to 10gross disobedience or misconduct on a school bus, the board 11may suspend the student in excess of 10 school days for safety 12reasons. 13    Any suspension shall be reported immediately to the 14parents or guardians of a student along with a full statement 15of the reasons for such suspension, any evidence, including, 16but not limited to, video evidence and written materials, held 17by the school district that led to the suspension of the 18student, and a notice of the parents' or guardians' their 19right to a review. The school board must be given a summary of 20the notice, including the reason for the suspension and the 21suspension length. Upon request of the parents or guardians, 22the school board or a hearing officer appointed by it shall 23review such action of the superintendent or principal, 24assistant principal, or dean of students. At such review, the 25parents or guardians of the student may appear and discuss the 26suspension with the board or its hearing officer. If a hearing   SB2876- 14 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1officer is appointed by the board, he shall report to the board 2a written summary of the evidence heard at the meeting. After 3its hearing or upon receipt of the written report of its 4hearing officer, the board may take such action as it finds 5appropriate. If a student is suspended pursuant to this 6subsection (b), the board shall, in the written suspension 7decision, detail the specific act of gross disobedience or 8misconduct resulting in the decision to suspend. The 9suspension decision shall also include a rationale as to the 10specific duration of the suspension. Nothing in this 11subsection (b) requires a school district to not be in 12compliance with the federal Family Educational Rights and 13Privacy Act of 1974. 14    (b-5) Among the many possible disciplinary interventions 15and consequences available to school officials, school 16exclusions, such as out-of-school suspensions and expulsions, 17are the most serious. School officials shall limit the number 18and duration of expulsions and suspensions to the greatest 19extent practicable, and it is recommended that they use them 20only for legitimate educational purposes. To ensure that 21students are not excluded from school unnecessarily, it is 22recommended that school officials consider forms of 23non-exclusionary discipline prior to using out-of-school 24suspensions or expulsions. 25    (b-10) Unless otherwise required by federal law or this 26Code, school boards may not institute zero-tolerance policies   SB2876- 15 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1by which school administrators are required to suspend or 2expel students for particular behaviors.3    (b-15) Out-of-school suspensions of 3 days or less may be 4used only if the student's continuing presence in school would 5pose a threat to school safety or a disruption to other 6students' learning opportunities. For purposes of this 7subsection (b-15), "threat to school safety or a disruption to 8other students' learning opportunities" shall be determined on 9a case-by-case basis by the school board or its designee. 10School officials shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve 11such threats, address such disruptions, and minimize the 12length of suspensions to the greatest extent practicable.13    (b-20) Unless otherwise required by this Code, 14out-of-school suspensions of longer than 3 days, expulsions, 15and disciplinary removals to alternative schools may be used 16only if other appropriate and available behavioral and 17disciplinary interventions have been exhausted and the 18student's continuing presence in school would either (i) pose 19a threat to the safety of other students, staff, or members of 20the school community or (ii) substantially disrupt, impede, or 21interfere with the operation of the school. For purposes of 22this subsection (b-20), "threat to the safety of other 23students, staff, or members of the school community" and 24"substantially disrupt, impede, or interfere with the 25operation of the school" shall be determined on a case-by-case 26basis by school officials. For purposes of this subsection   SB2876- 16 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1(b-20), the determination of whether "appropriate and 2available behavioral and disciplinary interventions have been 3exhausted" shall be made by school officials. School officials 4shall make all reasonable efforts to resolve such threats, 5address such disruptions, and minimize the length of student 6exclusions to the greatest extent practicable. Within the 7suspension decision described in subsection (b) of this 8Section or the expulsion decision described in subsection (a) 9of this Section, it shall be documented whether other 10interventions were attempted or whether it was determined that 11there were no other appropriate and available interventions.12    (b-25) Students who are suspended out-of-school for longer 13than 3 school days shall be provided appropriate and available 14support services during the period of their suspension. For 15purposes of this subsection (b-25), "appropriate and available 16support services" shall be determined by school authorities. 17Within the suspension decision described in subsection (b) of 18this Section, it shall be documented whether such services are 19to be provided or whether it was determined that there are no 20such appropriate and available services. 21    A school district may refer students who are expelled to 22appropriate and available support services.23    A school district shall create a policy to facilitate the 24re-engagement of students who are suspended out-of-school, 25expelled, or returning from an alternative school setting. In 26consultation with stakeholders deemed appropriate by the State   SB2876- 17 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1Board of Education, the State Board of Education shall draft 2and publish guidance for the re-engagement of students who are 3suspended out-of-school, expelled, or returning from an 4alternative school setting in accordance with this Section and 5Section 13A-4 on or before July 1, 2025. 6    (b-30) A school district shall create a policy by which 7suspended students, including those students suspended from 8the school bus who do not have alternate transportation to 9school, shall have the opportunity to make up work for 10equivalent academic credit. It shall be the responsibility of 11a student's parents or guardians to notify school officials 12that a student suspended from the school bus does not have 13alternate transportation to school. 14    (b-35) In all suspension review hearings conducted under 15subsection (b) or expulsion hearings conducted under 16subsection (a), a student may disclose any factor to be 17considered in mitigation, including his or her status as a 18parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 19violence, as defined in Article 26A. A representative of the 20parent's or guardian's choice, or of the student's choice if 21emancipated, must be permitted to represent the student 22throughout the proceedings and to address the school board or 23its appointed hearing officer. With the approval of the 24student's parent or guardian, or of the student if 25emancipated, a support person must be permitted to accompany 26the student to any disciplinary hearings or proceedings. The   SB2876- 18 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1representative or support person must comply with any rules of 2the school district's hearing process. If the representative 3or support person violates the rules or engages in behavior or 4advocacy that harasses, abuses, or intimidates either party, a 5witness, or anyone else in attendance at the hearing, the 6representative or support person may be prohibited from 7further participation in the hearing or proceeding. A 8suspension or expulsion proceeding under this subsection 9(b-35) must be conducted independently from any ongoing 10criminal investigation or proceeding, and an absence of 11pending or possible criminal charges, criminal investigations, 12or proceedings may not be a factor in school disciplinary 13decisions.14    (b-40) During a suspension review hearing conducted under 15subsection (b) or an expulsion hearing conducted under 16subsection (a) that involves allegations of sexual violence by 17the student who is subject to discipline, neither the student 18nor his or her representative shall directly question nor have 19direct contact with the alleged victim. The student who is 20subject to discipline or his or her representative may, at the 21discretion and direction of the school board or its appointed 22hearing officer, suggest questions to be posed by the school 23board or its appointed hearing officer to the alleged victim. 24    (c) A school board must invite a representative from a 25local mental health agency to consult with the board at the 26meeting whenever there is evidence that mental illness may be   SB2876- 19 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1the cause of a student's expulsion or suspension.2    (c-5) School districts shall make reasonable efforts to 3provide ongoing professional development to all school 4personnel, school board members, and school resource officers 5on the requirements of this Section and Section 10-20.14, the 6adverse consequences of school exclusion and justice-system 7involvement, effective classroom management strategies, 8culturally responsive discipline, trauma-responsive learning 9environments, as defined in subsection (b) of Section 3-11, 10the appropriate and available supportive services for the 11promotion of student attendance and engagement, and 12developmentally appropriate disciplinary methods that promote 13positive and healthy school climates. 14    (d) The board may expel a student for a definite period of 15time not to exceed 2 calendar years, as determined on a 16case-by-case basis. A student who is determined to have 17brought one of the following objects to school, any 18school-sponsored activity or event, or any activity or event 19that bears a reasonable relationship to school shall be 20expelled for a period of not less than one year:21        (1) A firearm. For the purposes of this Section, 22    "firearm" means any gun, rifle, shotgun, weapon as defined 23    by Section 921 of Title 18 of the United States Code, 24    firearm as defined in Section 1.1 of the Firearm Owners 25    Identification Card Act, or firearm as defined in Section 26    24-1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. The expulsion period   SB2876- 20 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1    under this subdivision (1) may be modified by the 2    superintendent, and the superintendent's determination may 3    be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis.4        (2) A knife, brass knuckles or other knuckle weapon 5    regardless of its composition, a billy club, or any other 6    object if used or attempted to be used to cause bodily 7    harm, including "look alikes" of any firearm as defined in 8    subdivision (1) of this subsection (d). The expulsion 9    requirement under this subdivision (2) may be modified by 10    the superintendent, and the superintendent's determination 11    may be modified by the board on a case-by-case basis. 12Expulsion or suspension shall be construed in a manner 13consistent with the federal Individuals with Disabilities 14Education Act. A student who is subject to suspension or 15expulsion as provided in this Section may be eligible for a 16transfer to an alternative school program in accordance with 17Article 13A of the School Code.18    (d-5) The board may suspend or by regulation authorize the 19superintendent of the district or the principal, assistant 20principal, or dean of students of any school to suspend a 21student for a period not to exceed 10 school days or may expel 22a student for a definite period of time not to exceed 2 23calendar years, as determined on a case-by-case basis, if (i) 24that student has been determined to have made an explicit 25threat on an Internet website against a school employee, a 26student, or any school-related personnel, (ii) the Internet   SB2876- 21 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1website through which the threat was made is a site that was 2accessible within the school at the time the threat was made or 3was available to third parties who worked or studied within 4the school grounds at the time the threat was made, and (iii) 5the threat could be reasonably interpreted as threatening to 6the safety and security of the threatened individual because 7of the individual's duties or employment status or status as a 8student inside the school. 9    (e) To maintain order and security in the schools, school 10authorities may inspect and search places and areas such as 11lockers, desks, parking lots, and other school property and 12equipment owned or controlled by the school, as well as 13personal effects left in those places and areas by students, 14without notice to or the consent of the student, and without a 15search warrant. As a matter of public policy, the General 16Assembly finds that students have no reasonable expectation of 17privacy in these places and areas or in their personal effects 18left in these places and areas. School authorities may request 19the assistance of law enforcement officials for the purpose of 20conducting inspections and searches of lockers, desks, parking 21lots, and other school property and equipment owned or 22controlled by the school for illegal drugs, weapons, or other 23illegal or dangerous substances or materials, including 24searches conducted through the use of specially trained dogs. 25If a search conducted in accordance with this Section produces 26evidence that the student has violated or is violating either   SB2876- 22 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1the law, local ordinance, or the school's policies or rules, 2such evidence may be seized by school authorities, and 3disciplinary action may be taken. School authorities may also 4turn over such evidence to law enforcement authorities.5    (f) Suspension or expulsion may include suspension or 6expulsion from school and all school activities and a 7prohibition from being present on school grounds.8    (g) A school district may adopt a policy providing that if 9a student is suspended or expelled for any reason from any 10public or private school in this or any other state, the 11student must complete the entire term of the suspension or 12expulsion in an alternative school program under Article 13A 13of this Code or an alternative learning opportunities program 14under Article 13B of this Code before being admitted into the 15school district if there is no threat to the safety of students 16or staff in the alternative program. A school district that 17adopts a policy under this subsection (g) must include a 18provision allowing for consideration of any mitigating 19factors, including, but not limited to, a student's status as 20a parent, expectant parent, or victim of domestic or sexual 21violence, as defined in Article 26A. 22    (h) School officials shall not advise or encourage 23students to drop out voluntarily due to behavioral or academic 24difficulties.25    (i) A student may not be issued a monetary fine or fee as a 26disciplinary consequence, though this shall not preclude   SB2876- 23 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1requiring a student to provide restitution for lost, stolen, 2or damaged property.3    (j) Subsections (a) through (i) of this Section shall 4apply to elementary and secondary schools, charter schools, 5special charter districts, and school districts organized 6under Article 34 of this Code. 7    (k) Through June 30, 2026, the expulsion of students 8enrolled in programs funded under Section 1C-2 of this Code is 9subject to the requirements under paragraph (7) of subsection 10(a) of Section 2-3.71 of this Code.11    (k-5) On and after July 1, 2026, the expulsion of children 12enrolled in programs funded under Section 15-25 of the 13Department of Early Childhood Act is subject to the 14requirements of paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Section 1515-30 of the Department of Early Childhood Act. 16    (l) An in-school suspension program provided by a school 17district for any students in kindergarten through grade 12 may 18focus on promoting non-violent conflict resolution and 19positive interaction with other students and school personnel. 20A school district may employ a school social worker or a 21licensed mental health professional to oversee an in-school 22suspension program in kindergarten through grade 12. 23(Source: P.A. 102-466, eff. 7-1-25; 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 24102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-594, eff. 6-25-24; 103-896, eff. 258-9-24; revised 9-25-24.)   SB2876- 24 -LRB104 15184 LNS 28328 b1    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 2changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 3that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 4represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 5not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 6made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 7Public Act. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.